Utah statutes.
63G-2-205.   Denials.

(1)  If the governmental entity denies the request in whole or part, it shall provide a notice of denial to the requester either in person or by sending the notice to the requester's address.

(2)  The notice of denial shall contain the following information:

(a)  a description of the record or portions of the record to which access was denied, provided that the description does not disclose private, controlled, or protected information or information exempt from disclosure under Subsection 63G-2-201(3)(b);

(b)  citations to the provisions of this chapter, court rule or order, another state statute, federal statute, or federal regulation that exempt the record or portions of the record from disclosure, provided that the citations do not disclose private, controlled, or protected information or information exempt from disclosure under Subsection 63G-2-201(3)(b);

(c)  a statement that the requester has the right to appeal the denial to the chief administrative officer of the governmental entity; and

(d)  the time limits for filing an appeal, and the name and business address of the chief administrative officer of the governmental entity.

(3)  Unless otherwise required by a court or agency of competent jurisdiction, a governmental entity may not destroy or give up custody of any record to which access was denied until the period for an appeal has expired or the end of the appeals process, including judicial appeal.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

